Washington statutes.
RCW 43.71.120

Applications to federal government for waivers and other flexibilities.

(1) The exchange, in close consultation with the authority and the office of the insurance commissioner, must explore all opportunities to apply to the secretary of health and human services under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 18052 for a waiver or other available federal flexibilities to:

(a) Receive federal funds for the implementation of the premium assistance or cost-sharing reduction programs established under RCW 43.71.110;

(b) Increase access to qualified health plans; and

(c) Implement or expand other exchange programs that increase affordability of or access to health insurance coverage in Washington state.

(2) If, through the process described in subsection (1) of this section[,] an opportunity to submit a waiver is identified, the exchange, in collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner and the health care authority, may develop an application under this section to be submitted by the health care authority. If an application is submitted, the health care authority must notify the chairs and ranking minority members of the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(3) Any application submitted under this section must meet all federal public notice and comment requirements under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 18052(a)(4)(B), including public hearings to ensure a meaningful level of public input.

[ 2021 c 246 s 2.]